Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2741.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 1, chapter 3, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 1-323, to read: START_STATUTE1-323. National day of racial healing; observation A. The third Tuesday in January, in each year, shall be observed as the national day of racial healing. B. National day of racial healing is not a legal holiday.END_STATUTE